nursery/apertium-ga-gd/apertium-ga-gd.gd.dix
    <pardef n="sèimh/ich__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eachadh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eachaidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichibh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    
    <pardef n="leòn__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ta</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ta</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ta</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ta</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>adh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aidh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>adh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>adh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>adh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>adh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aidh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aidh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aidh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aidh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aidh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aidh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>adh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>adh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>adh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>adh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ainn</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>amaid</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aidh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aidh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aidh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aidh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aidh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aidh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aibh</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  


    </pardefs>

    <e lm="leòn"><i>leòn</i><par n="leòn__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sèimhich"><i>sèimh</i><par n="sèimh/ich__vblex"/></e>
